Hawaii, session 2026, GM1296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the malama ohana
working group, established by Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii
2023, was tasked with recommending transformative changes to the
State's child welfare system. For fifteen months, seventeen
members of the working group representing those serving youth,
as well as youth, families, and community members throughout the
State, opened their hearts and listened deeply to the stories of
lived ejcperience within the child welfare system. They
developed recommendations to establish a child welfare system
that is trauma-informed, sustains a community-based partnership,
and responds to the needs of children and families in the system
and the community. The result of this work was a powerful
vision for transforming how Hawaii supports families and
protects children.
Among the many recommendations to move toward this vision
was to strengthen the capacity of the child welfare services
branch to manage cases that are complicated by domestic violence
2026-3479 HB1801 CDl HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO 1801
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
experienced by a parent or children in the family. In cases
involving domestic violence, the child welfare services system
must differentiate between parents who cooperate with the system
and those who use the system to punish or continue abusing their
partner.
The legislature further finds that child welfare services
social workers support and advocate for families and children
experiencing domestic violence through counseling, as well as
connecting clients with legal and community resources that
support safety and stability. One such resource is provided
through a one-year contract between the department of human
services and Domestic Violence Services for Families, a program
of Child and Family Service, a non-profit corporation that
provides referred clients with individual and group education,
counseling, safety and service plans, supervised visitation,
parenting skills, and temporary restraining order assistance, if
needed.
In 2025, the child welfare services branch confirmed one
hundred eighty-one cases of children experiencing domestic
violence, and one hundred seventy-nine cases with confirmed
child victims. To assist the child welfare services branch with
2026-3479 HB1801 CDl HMSO

lOIIIMIIIIIIBIilllllllllllll

Page 3 H.B. NO. 1801
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
better detecting and servicing the growing number of cases of
domestic violence, three new initiatives will need to be
implemented.
The first initiative involves specialized, comprehensive
domestic violence training for child welfare services branch
staff, tailored to their roles.
The second initiative is to develop a tracking system to be
integrated into the new computer system currently being
developed for the child welfare services branch, which is
projected to be available by the end of 2026. The new system
would monitor identified domestic violence cases and report on
the numbers, what specialized services were offered and used,
and the dispositions of the cases. This will help ensure
domestic violence cases are being monitored, identify patterns
of behavior that may be used to predict risk, and provide data
to inform policies for effective service delivery.
The third initiative is to establish a system in which a
contracted domestic violence specialist provides virtual or in-
person consultation at child welfare services branch offices.
The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the
department of human services to contract with one or more
2026-3479 HB1801 CDl HMSO
niiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiniiiii

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
organizations specializing in domestic violence to provide
training and consultation virtually or in-person to staff in
child welfare services branch offices statewide.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
department of human services to contract with one or more
organizations specializing in domestic violence to provide
training and consultation virtually or in-person to staff
investigating reports of child abuse or neglect involving
domestic violence.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
human services for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3479 HB1801 CDl HMSO

1801
H.B. NO
I b
w o
o b
APPROVED this 7th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1801, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine-K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1801, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
119-26